Nebraska, session 109, LB832.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB832 LB832
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 68-994, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-994 Until July 1, 2030 2023, the department shall not add long-
term care services and supports to the medicaid managed care program. For
purposes of this section, long-term care services and supports includes
services of a skilled nursing facility, a nursing facility, and an
assisted-living facility and home and community-based services.
Sec. 2. Original section 68-994, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-